District of Columbia statutes.
19-1513

When disclaimer barred or limited.

(a)

A disclaimer is barred by a written waiver of the right to disclaim.

(b)

A disclaimer of an interest in property is barred if any of the following events occur before the disclaimer becomes effective:

(1)

The disclaimant accepts the interest sought to be disclaimed;

(2)

The disclaimant voluntarily assigns, conveys, encumbers, pledges, or transfers the interest sought to be disclaimed or contracts to do so; or

(3)

A judicial sale of the interest sought to be disclaimed occurs.

(c)

A disclaimer, in whole or part, of the future exercise of a power held in a fiduciary capacity is not barred by its previous exercise.

(d)

A disclaimer, in whole or part, of the future exercise of a power not held in a fiduciary capacity is not barred by its previous exercise unless the power is exercisable in favor of the disclaimant.

(e)

A disclaimer is barred or limited if so provided by law other than this chapter.

(f)

A disclaimer of a power over property which is barred by this section is ineffective. A disclaimer of an interest in property which is barred by this section takes effect as a transfer of the interest disclaimed to the persons who would have taken the interest under this chapter had the disclaimer not been barred.

Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-205, § 2(b), 53 DCR 9063
This section is referenced in § 19-1516.
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 13 of the Uniform Disclaimer of Property Interests Act (1999).